Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB819.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1205.1(c.1)(3) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1205.1. Continuing Professional Development.--* * *(c.1) The continuing professional education plan shall specify the professional education needs that will be met by completion of each continuing professional education option and how it relates to areas of assignment and certification or potential administrative certification. The options may include, 123456789101112131415161718192021 but shall not be limited to:* * *(3) Other programs, activities or learning experiences taken for credit or hourly, to include:(i) curriculum development and other program design and delivery activities at the school entity or grade level as determined by the school entity and approved by the board of directors;(ii) participation in professional conferences and workshops;(iii) education in the workplace, where the work relates to the professional educator's area of assignment and is approved by the board of directors;(iv) review, redesign and restructuring of school programs, organizations and functions as determined by the school entity and approved by the board of directors;(v) in-service programs that comply with guidelines established by the department;(vi) early childhood and child development activities for professional educators whose area of assignment includes kindergarten through third grade;(vii) special education activities for professional educators whose area of assignment includes students with special needs;(viii) successful completion of department training for service as a Distinguished Educator if the professional educator participates in and completes at least one assignment in the Distinguished Educators Program;(ix) other continuing professional education courses, programs, activities or learning experiences sponsored by the 20250HB0819PN0987 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department; [or](x) visits by educators to a manufacturing workplace for orientation and demonstrations to give the professional educator a greater understanding of job opportunities in manufacturing for students[.]; or(xi) providing opportunities for educators to serve as rigorous course of study coaches to support teachers in delivering high-quality rigorous courses of study. For the purposes of this subparagraph, the term "rigorous course of study" shall have the same meaning as in section 1702-E.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-EACCESS TO RIGOROUS COURSES OF STUDY FOR ALL STUDENTSSection 1701-E. Scope of article.This article relates to access to rigorous courses of study for all students.Section 1702-E. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Core academic areas." Mathematics, English language arts, science, social studies and computer science."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Educator." A "professional employe," "temporary professional employe" or "substitute" as those terms are defined in section 1101."Educator training entity." An institution of higher education, intermediate unit or other organization approved by 20250HB0819PN0987 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the department to train educators to teach rigorous courses of study."Eligible educator." An educator who is certified in the subject area of the rigorous course of study that the educator will be teaching."Eligible school entity." A school entity that does not meet the minimum benchmarks for rigorous course of study offerings established by the department under section 1703-E(c)(2)(i) or is unable to offer a rigorous course of study due to the retirement, departure or other loss of an educator who teaches a rigorous course of study."Exam fee." The amount required to take an exam associated with a rigorous course of study."Institution of higher education." The term includes any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A.(2) A university within the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A.(3) A State-related institution as defined in section 1502-A.(4) Any accredited nonprofit public, private or independent college or university."Program." The Access to Rigorous Courses of Study for All Students Grant Program established under section 1704-E."Rigorous course of study." An academically rigorous college-level course, including Advanced Placement, International Baccalaureate, Cambridge International, dual credit or a concentrated career and technical education program, delivered to secondary students by an eligible educator that may include an end-of-course exam that qualifies students to earn 20250HB0819PN0987 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 college credit for prior learning."School entity." A school district, area career and technical school, cyber charter school, charter school, regional charter school or intermediate unit operating in this Commonwealth."Secondary student." A student in grades seven through twelve who is enrolled in a school entity."Virtual learning instruction." The provision of academic courses and instruction to students through the Internet or the use of video or audio technology by an educator.Section 1703-E. Equitable access to rigorous courses of study.(a) Access.-- Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each school entity receiving a grant under section 1704-E(b) shall provide secondary students with expanded opportunities to enroll in rigorous courses of study as well as exam fee assistance, as appropriate.(b) Supplement.--If possible the rigorous courses of study offered by an institution of higher education, through an agreement shall supplement, not supplant courses offered by the school entity or the secondary school students. An agreement under this subsection shall encompass the same parameters under section 1525(a).(c) Duties.-- (1) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, and each year thereafter, each school entity shall report the following to the department, in a manner determined by the department:(i) All rigorous courses of study disaggregated by type that are available to the school entity's secondary students for the current school year.20250HB0819PN0987 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Students participating in rigorous courses of study, disaggregated by type, by student group.(iii) Students who complete rigorous courses of study, disaggregated by type, by student group.(iv) Students who took an end-of-course exam in a rigorous course of study, by student group, type of exam and score received.(v) The number of college-level credits earned by each student enrolled in a dual-credit course, by student group.(2) No later than December 1, 2026, and every five years thereafter, the department shall:(i) Establish benchmarks to improve secondary student access to and enrollment in rigorous courses of study.(ii) Identify school entities that require technical assistance to improve secondary student access to and enrollment in rigorous courses of study.(iii) Prepare a report containing the information provided under paragraph (1), as well as the benchmarks established and school entities identified under subparagraphs (i) and (ii), and post the report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. Beginning with the report required to be posted on December 1, 2029, the report shall include an explanation of whether school entities in this Commonwealth are progressing or regressing in improving secondary student access to and enrollment in rigorous courses of study.Section 1704-E. Access to Rigorous Courses of Study for All Students Grant Program.20250HB0819PN0987 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Purpose.--Subject to funding being appropriated for this purpose, the Access to Rigorous Courses of Study for All Students Grant Program is established in the department to help ensure that all school entities have properly trained educators to meet the rigorous courses of study benchmarks established under section 1703-E(c)(2)(i) and to provide rigorous courses of study exam fee assistance to students.(b) Educator training grants to school entities.--(1) A school entity that does not meet a minimum rigorous course benchmark established by the department under section 1703-E(c)(2)(i) shall be eligible for annual grants for a maximum of five consecutive years to train educators to teach rigorous courses of study to enable the school entity to meet the benchmark and further expand access to rigorous courses of study beyond the benchmark over the five-year grant period. A SCHOOL ENTITY THAT OFFERS LESS THAN EIGHT RIGOROUS COURSES OF STUDY SHALL BE DEEMED AN ELIGIBLE SCHOOL ENTITY THAT MAY APPLY FOR AN EDUCATOR TRAINING GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM. IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER ACADEMIC AREAS, A SCHOOL ENTITY THAT RECEIVES AN EDUCATOR TRAINING GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL OFFER RIGOROUS COURSES OF STUDY IN CORE ACADEMIC AREAS.(2) The department may limit the number of educators per school building within an eligible school entity for whom the eligible school entity may receive an educator training grant.(3) Multiple eligible school entities may apply jointly for an educator training grant under the program if the educators to be trained will provide instruction in more than one eligible school entity through classroom instruction or 20250HB0819PN0987 - 7 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 virtual learning instruction.(4) The department shall develop an application process and application form for an eligible school entity seeking an educator training grant under the program. The application form shall include the following:(i) The subject areas in which the eligible school entity currently has rigorous courses of study offerings.(ii) The subject areas in which the eligible school entity does not have rigorous courses of study offerings.(iii) The eligible school entity's plan to expand and increase rigorous courses of study participation within the eligible school entity, including for student populations that have been traditionally underserved, and how an educator training grant will help expedite the eligible school entity's progress toward its rigorous course of study participation goals.(iv) The following information:(A) The names of the eligible educators to be trained using educator training grant proceeds.(B) The school buildings within the eligible school entity where the eligible educators will teach.(C) The rigorous course of study subject areas in which the eligible educators will provide instruction.(D) Whether the instruction will be provided through traditional classroom instruction or virtual learning instruction.(v) The names of the educator training entities that will train the eligible educators to teach rigorous 20250HB0819PN0987 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 courses of study.(vi) An agreement that the eligible school entity will commit to offering the rigorous courses of study to secondary students for at least five years.(5) By June 30 of each year, each school entity that receives an educator training grant under this section shall report to the department the following for the immediately preceding school year in a form and manner determined by the department:(i) Students who enrolled in rigorous courses of study taught by an educator who received training funded by the grant and the number of students who completed the rigorous course of study.(ii) The number of students who took an end-of-course exam in rigorous courses of study taught by an educator who received training funded by the grant.(iii) The grade levels in which rigorous courses of study were taught.(iv) The number of educators who received training funded by the grant who taught rigorous courses of study, disaggregated by type within the school entity.(v) The number and percentage of secondary students who achieve a qualifying score, reported separately, from a rigorous course of study exam at school entities.(vi) The number and percentage of secondary students who complete rigorous courses of study for dual postsecondary credit, but within a school entity. (6) The requirements of this section are subject to funding being appropriated for this purpose.(c) Student exam fee subsidy.--Subject to funding being 20250HB0819PN0987 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriated for this purpose, beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the department shall provide rigorous course of study exam fee assistance in accordance with the following:(1) To the extent funding is available, the department shall provide funding to school entities to subsidize the cost for students to take end-of-course exams that lead to the awarding of post-secondary credit, certification or licensure.(2) On an annual basis, each school entity shall certify to the department the amount of funding due under paragraph (1) in accordance with guidelines developed by the department and posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REIMBURSE SCHOOL ENTITIES 100% OF THE EXAM FEE FOR EACH STUDENT AT OR BELOW 185% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY THRESHOLD WHO COMPLETES AN EXAM FOR A RIGOROUS COURSE OF STUDY FOR WHICH THE STUDENT MAY TAKE AN EXAM FOR COLLEGE CREDIT.(2) ON AN ANNUAL BASIS, EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL CERTIFY TO THE DEPARTMENT THE AMOUNT OF REIMBURSEMENT DUE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) IN ACCORDANCE WITH GUIDELINES DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND POSTED ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.Section 1705-E. Powers and duties of department.(a) Rules.--The department shall establish guidelines and procedures necessary for the implementation of this article.(b) Report.--By September 1, 2027, and every five years thereafter, the department shall issue a report on the program to the General Assembly that includes:(1) The number of educators in school entities who 20250HB0819PN0987 - 10 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 received training in rigorous course instruction by type and subject.(2) The number and percentage of schools enrolling secondary students that offer rigorous courses of study over the five-year grant period.(3) The number and percentage of secondary students who completed rigorous courses of study at school entities.(4) The number and percentage of secondary students who achieved a qualifying score, reported separately, from a rigorous course of study exam at school entities.(5) The number and percentage of institutions of higher education located within this Commonwealth that provide post-secondary credit for rigorous courses of study exam scores. (6) The names of the school entities and high schools that do not offer rigorous courses of study or are below the minimum benchmark established by the department under section 1703-E(c)(2)(i).(7) The number and percentage of secondary students who completed rigorous courses of study at the institution of higher education for dual credit.(8) The number and percentage of institutions of higher education located in this Commonwealth that provide dual credit for rigorous courses of study.(9) The number of educators who were trained to teach rigorous courses of study outside the core academic areas who are teaching other rigorous courses of study.Section 1706-E. Program funding.(a) Funding.--Funding for the program, except for dual credit, shall be made from annual appropriations made by the General Assembly to the department for that purpose, as well as 20250HB0819PN0987 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 available Federal funds or funds from private sources.(b) Priorities.--In the event of insufficient funds in any fiscal year, the department shall prioritize funding based on the number and percent of low-income students enrolled in the eligible school entity's poverty level and deficiency in providing rigorous course of study opportunities as compared to the benchmark established by the department under section 1703-E(c)(2)(i).Section 1707-E. Rights of school employees.Nothing in this article shall be construed to supersede or preempt the rights, remedies and procedures afforded to school employees or labor organizations under Federal or State law, including the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act, or any provision of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated between a school employer and an exclusive representative of the employees in accordance with that act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0819PN0987 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718